Washington statutes.
RCW 26.16.190

Liability for acts of other spouse or other domestic partner.

For all injuries committed by a married person or domestic partner, there shall be no recovery against the separate property of the other spouse or other domestic partner except in cases where there would be joint responsibility if the marriage or the state registered domestic partnership did not exist.

[ 2008 c 6 s 616; 1972 ex.s. c 108 s 6; Code 1881 s 2402; RRS s 6904.]

NOTES:

Part headings not law—Severability—2008 c 6: See RCW 26.60.900 and 26.60.901.